California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
 California that, as of the date of receipt by the Franchise Tax Board of the documents required under paragraph (1), is listed by the Secretary of State or Franchise Tax Board as “suspended” or “forfeited” may not establish its exemption under paragraph (1) and shall not receive an acknowledgment referred to under subparagraph (A) from the Franchise Tax Board until that corporation is listed by the Secretary of State and the Franchise Tax Board as an “active” corporation.

(3) If, for federal income tax purposes, an organization’s exemption from tax as an organization described in Section 501(c)(3), (c)(4), (c)(5), (c)(6), (c)(7), or (c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code is suspended or revoked, the organization shall notify the Franchise Tax Board of the suspension or revocation, in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board. Upon
 notification, the board shall suspend or revoke, whichever is applicable, for state income tax purposes, the organization’s exemption under paragraph (1).

(4) This subdivision shall not be construed to prevent the Franchise Tax Board from revoking the exemption of an organization that is not organized or operated in accordance with California law, this chapter, or Section 501(c)(3), (c)(4), (c)(5), (c)(6), (c)(7), or (c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(5) If the Franchise Tax Board suspends or revokes the exemption of an organization pursuant to paragraph (3) or (4), the exemption shall be reinstated only upon compliance with this section, regardless of whether the organization can establish exemption under paragraph (1).

(c) This section shall not prevent a determination from having retroactive effect and does not prevent the issuance of a determination with respect to a domestic organization which was in existence prior to January 1, 1970, and exempt under prior law without the submission of a formal application or payment of a filing fee. For the purpose of this section, the term “domestic” means created or organized under the laws of this state.

(d) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this article.

(e) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on January 1, 2021.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 59, Sec. 2.   (SB 934)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

23701a.

(a) Labor, agricultural, or horticultural organizations other than cooperative organizations described in Section 24404 or 24405 (unless the cooperative organization is determined by the Internal Revenue Service to be an organization described in Section 501(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended).

For purposes of this section, the term “agricultural” includes the art or science of cultivating land, harvesting crops or aquatic resources, or raising livestock.

(b) The amendments to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall be applied in the computation of taxes for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1983.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 91.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23701b.

A fraternal order described in Section 501(c)(8) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 252, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23701c.

A cemetery company described in Section 501(c)(13) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 252, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23701d.

(a) A corporation, community chest or trust, organized and operated exclusively for religious, charitable, scientific, testing for public safety, literary, or educational purposes, or to foster national or international amateur sports competition (but only if no part of its activities involved the provision of athletic facilities or equipment), or for the prevention of cruelty to children or animals,
 no part of the net earnings of which inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual, no substantial part of the activities of which is carrying on propaganda or otherwise attempting to influence legislation (except as otherwise provided in Section 23704.5), and which does not participate in, or intervene in (including the publishing or distribution of statements), any political campaign on behalf of (or in opposition to) any candidate for public office. An organization is not organized exclusively for exempt purposes listed above unless its assets are irrevocably dedicated to one or more purposes listed in this section. Dedication of assets requires that in the event of dissolution of an organization or the impossibility of performing the specific organizational purposes the assets would continue to be devoted to exempt purposes. Assets shall be deemed irrevocably dedicated to exempt purposes if the articles of organization provide that upon dissolution the assets will be distributed to an
 organization which is exempt under this section or Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code or to the federal government, or to a state or local government for public purposes; or by a provision in the articles of organization, satisfactory to the Franchise Tax Board; that the property will be distributed in trust for exempt purposes; or by establishing that the assets are irrevocably dedicated to exempt purposes by operation of law. The irrevocable dedication requirement shall not be a sole basis for revocation of an exempt determination made by the Franchise Tax Board prior to the effective date of this amendment.

(b) (1) In the case of a qualified amateur sports organization—

(A) The requirement of subdivision (a) that no part of its activities involves the provision of athletic facilities or equipment shall not apply.

(B) That organization shall not fail to meet the requirements of subdivision (a) merely because its membership is local or regional in nature.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “qualified amateur sports organization” means any organization organized and operated exclusively to foster national or international amateur sports competition if that organization is also organized and operated primarily to conduct national or international competition in sports or to support and develop amateur athletes for national or international competition in sports.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 536, Sec. 5.   (AB 1173)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

23701e.

A business league, chamber of commerce, real estate board, or a board of trade described in Section 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code, except that the phrase “or professional football leagues (whether or not administering a pension fund for football players)” shall not apply.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 252, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23701f.

(a) A civic league, social welfare organization, or local organization of employees described in Section 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, except as otherwise provided.

(b) An organization is not organized exclusively for exempt purposes under Section 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code unless its assets are irrevocably dedicated to one or more purposes listed in Section 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 252, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23701g.

A social organization described in Section 501(c)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 252, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23701h.

(a) A corporation described in Section 501(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain title-holding companies.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 23038, for purposes of applying Section 501(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code under this section, the term “corporation” includes a limited liability company that is classified as a partnership or as a disregarded entity.

(2) A limited liability company that, under the authority of this section, is exempt from the tax imposed by this part is also exempt from the tax and fees imposed under Chapter 10.6 (commencing with Section 17941) of Part 10.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 633, Sec. 7.   Effective September 30, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

23701i.

A voluntary employees’ beneficiary association described in Section 501(c)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 359, Sec. 29.   (AB 154)   Effective September 30, 2015.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Sec. 41 of Stats. 2015, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

23701j.

A teacher’s retirement fund association described in Section 501(c)(11) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 252, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23701k.

Religious or apostolic corporations, if such corporations have a common treasury or community treasury even if such corporations engaged in business for the common benefit of the members, but only if the members thereof include (at the time of filing their returns) in their gross income their entire pro rata shares, whether distributed or not, of the net income of the corporation for such year. Any amount so included in the gross income of a member shall be treated as a dividend received.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 23701h by Stats. 1951, Ch. 343.)
-------------------------------------------

23701l.

(a) A domestic fraternal society described in Section 501(c)(10) of the Internal Revenue Code, except as otherwise provided.

(b) For purposes of this section, the term “domestic” means created or organized in the United States or under the law of the United States
 or of any state or territory therein.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 252, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23701n.

(a) A supplemental unemployment compensation trust described in Section 501(c)(17) of the Internal Revenue Code, except as otherwise provided.

(b) The following references in Section 501(c)(17)(E) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be modified as follows:

(1) The phrase “under Section 23701” shall be substituted for the phrase “under subsection (a).”

(2) The phrase “Section 23701i” shall be substituted for the phrase “paragraph (9) of this subsection.”

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 252, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23701p.

A trust or plan which meets the requirements of Public Law 87-792, 76 U.S. Stats. 809, approved October 10, 1962 (the Self-Employed Individuals Tax Retirement Bill of 1962), but only if such trust or plan is not exempt from taxation under Section 17631.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1709.)
-------------------------------------------

23701r.

(a) A political organization.However, a political organization shall be subject to tax under this part with respect to its “political organization taxable income” and such income shall be subject to tax as provided by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501).

(b) For purposes of this section, the political organization taxable income of any organization for any taxable year is an amount equal to the excess over one hundred dollars ($100) (if any) of—

(1) The gross income for the taxable year (excluding any exempt function income), over

(2) The deductions allowed by this part which are directly connected with the production of the gross income (excluding exempt function income).

(c) For purposes of this section, the term “exempt function income” means any amount received as—(1) A contribution of money or other property,(2) Membership dues, a membership fee or assessment from a member of the political organization, or(3) Proceeds from a political fundraising or entertainment event, or proceeds from the sale of political campaign materials, which are not received in the ordinary course
 of any trade or business, to the extent such amount is segregated for use only for the exempt function of the political organization.

(d) For purposes of this part, if any political organization—(1) Contributes any amount to or for the use of any political organization which is treated as exempt from tax under subdivision (a) of this section,(2) Contributes any amount to or for the use of any organization described in paragraph (1) or (2) of Section 509(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, which is exempt from tax under Section 23701, or(3) Deposits any amount in the General Fund or the Treasury of the United States
 or in the General Fund of any state or local government, such amount shall be treated as an amount not diverted for the personal use of the candidate or any other person. No deduction shall be allowed under this part for the contribution or deposit of any amount described in the preceding sentence.

(e) For purposes of this section—

(1) The term “political organization” means a party, committee, association, fund, (including the trust of an individual candidate) or other organization (whether or not incorporated) organized and operated primarily for the purpose of directly or indirectly accepting contributions or making expenditures, or both, for an exempt function.

(2) The term “exempt function” means the function of influencing
 or attempting to influence the selection, nomination, election, or appointment of any individual to any federal, state, or local public office or office in a political organization, or the election of Presidential or Vice Presidential electors, whether or not such individual or electors are selected, nominated, elected, or appointed. The term includes the making of expenditures relating to an office described in the preceding sentence which, if incurred by the individual, would be allowable as a deduction under Section 162(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) The term “contributions” has the same meaning
 as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 24434.

(4) The term “expenditures” has the same meaning as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 24434.

(f) For purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), a separate segregated fund (within the meaning of Section 610 of Title 18 of the United States Code or of any similar state statute, or within the meaning of any state statute which permits the segregation of dues money for exempt functions, within the meaning of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e)) which is maintained by an organization described in Sections 23701a through 23701p or Section 23701s which is exempt from tax under Section 23701 shall be treated as a separate organization.

(g) (1) For purposes of this section, a fund established and maintained by an individual who holds, has been elected to, or is a candidate (within the meaning of paragraph (3)) for nomination or election to, any federal, state, or local elective public office for use by such individual exclusively for the preparation and circulation of such individual’s newsletter shall, except as provided in paragraph (2), be treated as if such fund constituted a political organization.

(2) In the case of any fund described in paragraph (1) the exempt function shall be only the preparation and circulation of the newsletter.

(3) For purposes of paragraph (1), “candidate” means with respect to any federal, state, or local elective public office, an individual
 who does both of the following:

(A) Publicly announces that they are a candidate for nomination or election to that office.

(B) Meets the qualifications prescribed by law to hold that office.

(h) The requirements set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 23701 shall not apply to a political organization or newsletter fund described in this section. However, in the case of a corporation incorporated or organized in this state or qualified to do business in this state, such corporation shall either pay the minimum tax provided in Section 23153 or obtain a certificate of exemption from the Franchise Tax Board before the corporation files with the Secretary of State its articles of incorporation or a duly certified copy
 thereof.

(i) The requirements set forth in Section 23772 or Section 23774 shall not apply to a political organization or newsletter fund. Further, the requirements set forth in Sections 18505, 18506, and 18601 shall not apply to a political organization or newsletter fund described in this section, except that if it has political organization taxable income for any taxable year, the political organization shall be required to file income tax returns or statements as determined by the Franchise Tax Board under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 59, Sec. 3.   (SB 934)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

23701s.

(a) An employee-funded pension trust described in Section 501(c)(18) of the Internal Revenue Code, except as otherwise provided.

(b) The last sentence in Section 501(c)(18) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to excess contributions under Section 4979, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 53.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

23701t.

(a) A homeowners’ association organized and operated to provide for the acquisition, construction, management, maintenance, and care of residential association property if all of the following apply:

(1) Sixty percent or more of the gross income of the organization for the taxable year consists solely of amounts received as membership dues, fees, and assessments from either of the following:

(A) Tenant-stockholders or owners of residential units, residences, or lots.

(B) Owners of time-share rights to use, or time-share ownership interests in, association property in the case of a time-share association.

(2) Ninety percent or more of the expenditures of the organization for the taxable year are expenditures for the acquisition, construction, management, maintenance, and care of association property and, in the case of a time-share association, for activities provided to or on behalf of members of the association.

(3) No part of the net earnings inures (other than by providing management, maintenance, and care of association property or by a rebate of excess membership dues, fees, or assessments) to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual.

(4) Amounts received as membership dues, fees, and assessments not expended for association purposes during the taxable year are transferred to and held in trust to provide for the management, maintenance, and care of association property and common areas.

(b) The term “association property” means:

(1) Property held by the organization.

(2) Property held in common by the members of the organization.

(3) Property within the organization privately held by the members of the organization.

In the case of a time-share association, “association property” includes property in which the time-share association, or members of the association, have rights
 arising out of recorded easements, covenants, or other recorded instruments to use property related to the time-share project.

(c) A homeowners’ association shall be subject to tax under this part with respect to its “homeowners’ association taxable income,” and that income shall be subject to tax as provided by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501).

(1) For purposes of this section, the term “homeowners’ association taxable income” of any organization for any taxable year means an amount equal to the excess over one hundred dollars ($100) (if any) of—

(A) The gross income for the taxable year (excluding any exempt function income), over

(B) The deductions allowed by this part which are directly connected with the production of the gross income
 (excluding exempt function income).

(2) For purposes of this section, the term “exempt function income” means any amount received as membership fees, dues, and assessments from tenant-shareholders or owners of residential units, residences, or lots, or owners of time-share rights to use, or time-share ownership interests in, association property in the case of a time-share association.

(d) The term “homeowners’ association” includes a condominium management association, a residential real estate management association, a time-share association, and a cooperative housing corporation.

(e) “Cooperative housing corporation” includes, but is not limited to, a limited-equity housing cooperative, as defined in Section 33007.5 of the Health and Safety Code, organized either as a nonprofit public benefit corporation pursuant
 to Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, or a nonprofit mutual benefit corporation pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(f) The term “time-share association” means any organization (other than a condominium management association) organized and operated to provide for the acquisition, construction, management, maintenance, and care of association property if any member thereof holds a time-share right to use, or a time-share ownership interest in, real property constituting association property.

(g) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 291.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

23701u.

An organization is operated exclusively for exempt purposes listed in Section 23701f and its net earnings are devoted exclusively to charitable purposes if that organization is a nonprofit public benefit corporation organized under Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, and if the specific and primary purpose for which the corporation is formed is to render financial assistance to government by financing, refinancing, acquiring, constructing, improving, leasing, selling, or otherwise conveying property of any kind to government. This financing ability shall be limited to the
 issuance of certificates of participation, or similar security arrangements.

For purposes of this section, “government” means the State of California, a city, city and county, county, school district, board of education, public corporation, hospital district, and any other special district.

An organization is not organized exclusively for the exempt purposes referred to in the first paragraph unless its assets are irrevocably dedicated to one or more purposes listed in Section 23701f.

Dedication of assets requires that in the event of dissolution of an organization or the impossibility of performing the specific organizational purposes, including default of lease payments, the assets would continue to be devoted to exempt purposes. Assets shall be deemed irrevocably dedicated to exempt purposes if the articles of organization provide that upon dissolution the assets will be
 distributed to an organization which is exempt under this section, Section 23701d, or Section 23701f, or under Section 501(c)(3) or Section 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code or to the federal government, or to a state or local government for public purposes; or by a provision in the articles of organization, satisfactory to the Franchise Tax Board, that the property will be distributed in trust for exempt purposes; or by establishing that the assets are irrevocably dedicated to exempt purposes by operation of law. Any organization that has had its exemption revoked by the Franchise Tax Board for failure to comply with Section 23701f may request a further review of its status under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1481, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

23701v.

(a) An organization of owners of manufactured homes or mobilehomes, who are tenants in a mobilehome park, formed for the purpose of purchasing the mobilehome park to convert it to condominium, stock cooperative, or other resident ownership interests.

(b) An organization shall not fail to meet the requirements of subdivision (a) merely because it manages, maintains, or cares for the mobilehome park it has purchased.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1270, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

23701w.

A veteran’s organization, as defined by Section 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 54.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

23701x.

(a) A corporation or trust described in Section 501(c)(25) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain title-holding companies.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 23038, for purposes of applying Section 501(c)(25) of the Internal Revenue Code under this section, the term “corporation” includes a limited liability company that is classified as a partnership or as a disregarded entity.

(2) A limited liability company that, under the authority of this section, is exempt from the tax imposed by this part is also exempt from the tax and fees imposed under Chapter 10.6 (commencing with Section 17941) of Part 10.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 633, Sec. 8.   Effective September 30, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

23701y.

A credit union as defined in Section 14002 of the Financial Code. In addition, those credit unions are exempt from all other taxes and licenses, state, county, and municipal, imposed upon those credit unions, except taxes upon their real property, local utility user taxes, sales and use taxes, state energy resources surcharges, state emergency telephone users surcharges, unrelated business income taxes pursuant to Section 23731, motor vehicle and other vehicle registration license fees, and any other tax or license fee imposed by the state upon vehicles, motor
 vehicles, or the operation thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

23701z.

An organization established pursuant to Section 5005.1 of the Corporations Code by three or more corporations as an arrangement for the pooling of self-insured claims or losses of those corporations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 954, Sec. 41.1.   Effective September 26, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

23701aa.

A public bank as defined in Section 57600 of the Government Code. In addition, a public bank is exempt from all other taxes and licenses, state, county, and municipal, imposed upon a public bank, local utility user taxes, sales and use taxes, state energy resources surcharges, state emergency telephone users surcharges, motor vehicle and other vehicle registration license fees, and any other tax or license fee imposed by the state upon vehicles, motor vehicles, or the operation
 thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 442, Sec. 17.   (AB 857)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

23702.

Section 502 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to feeder organizations, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(a) Exemption shall not be allowed to any organization on the basis that all of its profits are payable to another organization exempt from taxation under either Section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code or this article, if that business activity is being conducted by a separate organization.

(b) The reference to
 Section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to exemption, shall be modified to refer to Section 23701.

(c) The reference to Sections 512 and 512(b)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the exclusion of the deriving of rents from the definition of “trade or business,” shall be modified to refer to Section 23732.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 252, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23703.

(a) For purposes of this section, “charitable corporation” means a corporation defined in Section 12582.1 of the Government Code that is required to comply with the filing requirements set forth in Article 7 (commencing with Section 12580) of Chapter 6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) (1) The exemption granted to a charitable corporation under the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 23701) shall be revoked by the Franchise Tax Board in accordance with this section if the charitable corporation fails to file with the Attorney General any registration or periodic report required by Article 7 (commencing with Section 12580) of Chapter 6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) A revocation shall occur under this section only after the Attorney General has first notified the Franchise Tax Board in writing that a charitable corporation has failed to file any registration or periodic report on or before the due date thereof, and the Franchise Tax Board has mailed a notice to the charitable corporation stating that the Franchise Tax Board intends to revoke the exemption if the charitable corporation does not file with the Attorney General all past due and currently due documents
 required by Article 7 (commencing with Section 12580) of Chapter 6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(3) After receipt of all required documents from a charitable corporation, the Attorney General shall provide prompt notification to the Franchise Tax Board and the charitable corporation that the charitable corporation has filed all past due and currently due documents required by Article 7 (commencing with Section 12580) of Chapter 6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) (1) If the Franchise Tax Board does not obtain notification from the Attorney General pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) that the charitable corporation has complied with the filing requirements described in subdivision (b) by the last day of the applicable period, the Franchise Tax Board shall revoke the exemption granted to the
 charitable corporation pursuant to Section 23777 on the first day after the applicable period.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the applicable period means:

(A) For notifications of noncompliance from the Attorney General that are received by the Franchise Tax Board before the effective date of the act adding this section, the applicable period shall be 120 days after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(B) For notifications of noncompliance from the Attorney General that are received by the Franchise Tax Board on or after the effective date of the act adding this section, the applicable period shall be 120 days after the Franchise Tax Board mails notification of the intent to revoke the exemption granted to the charitable corporation.

(d) For a charitable corporation whose exemption has been disallowed pursuant to Section 23703, as amended by Section 94 of Chapter 862 of the Statutes of 2000, prior to the effective date of the act adding this section, the Franchise Tax Board may reestablish that charitable corporation’s exempt status under Section 23778, after receipt of notification from the Attorney General pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) that the filing requirements set forth in Article 7 (commencing with Section 12580) of Chapter 6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code have been fulfilled. For purposes of reestablishing the charitable corporation’s exempt status under Section 23778, disallowance under Section 23703, as amended by Section 94 of Chapter 862 of the Statutes of 2000, shall be considered a revocation of exemption.

(e) This section shall apply with respect to notifications of noncompliance received from the
 Attorney General before, on, or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 710, Sec. 2.   (SB 1341)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

23703.5.

Section 501(p) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to suspension of tax-exempt status of terrorist organizations, shall apply, except as otherwise provided:

(a) References to Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be modified to refer to Section 23701.

(b) Section 501(p)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting the phrase “under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and this part” for the
 phrase “under any provision of this title, including Sections 170, 545(b)(2), 556(b)(2), 642(c), 2055, 2106(a)(2), and 2522” contained therein.

(c) This section shall apply only during the period described in Section 501(p)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that the federal tax exemption of the organization described in Section 501(p)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code is suspended for federal income tax purposes under Section 501(p)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(d) Section 501(p)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply and in lieu thereof, notwithstanding any other provision of law, no organization or other person may challenge a suspension under this section, a designation or identification described in Section 501(p)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, the period of suspension described in Section 501(p)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, or a denial of a deduction under
 Section 501(p)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code as modified in subdivision (b) in any administrative or judicial proceeding relating to the California tax liability of the organization or other person.

(e) (1) Credit or refund (with interest) with respect to an overpayment shall be made if all of the following apply with respect to that overpayment:

(A) The tax exemption of any organization described in Section 501(p)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code is suspended under this section.

(B) Each designation and identification described in Section 501(p)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code which has been made with respect to that organization is determined to be erroneous under Section 501(p)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code for federal income tax purposes.

(C) The erroneous designations and identifications result in an overpayment of income tax for any taxable year by that organization.

(2) If the credit or refund of any overpayment of tax described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) is prevented at any time by the operation of any law or rule of law (including res judicata), the credit or refund may nevertheless be allowed or made if the claim therefor is filed before the close of the one-year period beginning on the date of the last determination described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).

(f) This section shall apply to designations made before, on, or after November 11, 2003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 55.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

23703.7.

Section 501(q) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules for credit counseling organizations, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(a) The phrase “Section 23701” shall be substituted for “subsection (a)” in Section 501(q)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) The phrase “described in Section 23701d or Section 23701f” shall be
 substituted for “described in paragraph (3) or (4) of subsection (c)” in Section 501(q)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) The phrase “described in Section 23701d and exempt from tax under Section 23701” shall be substituted for “described in subsection (c)(3) and exempt from tax under subsection (a)” in each place that it appears in Section 501(q)(1)(E) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(d) The phrase “described in Section 23701d shall not be exempt from tax under Section 23701” shall be substituted for “described in paragraph (3) of subsection (c) shall not be exempt from tax under subsection (a)” in Section 501(q)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(e) The phrase “described in Section 23701d and exempt from tax under Section 23701 on January 1, 2009,” shall be substituted for “described in paragraph (3) of
 subsection (c) and exempt from tax under subsection (a) on the date of the enactment of this subsection” in Section 501(q)(2)(B)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(f) The phrase “January 1, 2010,” shall be substituted for “the date of the enactment of this subsection” in Section 501(q)(2)(B)(ii)(I) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(g) The phrase “described in Section 23701f shall not be exempt from tax under Section 23701” shall be substituted for “described in paragraph (4) of subsection (c) shall not be exempt from tax under subsection (a)” in Section 501(q)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 60.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

23704.

Section 501(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to cooperative hospital service organizations, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(a) References to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to charitable organizations, shall be modified to refer to Section 23701d.

(b) References to Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to exemptions, shall be modified to refer to Section 23701.

(c) The services which may be provided under Section 501(e)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code shall include laundry services.

(d) Section 501(e)(1)(B)(iii) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting the phrase “owned and operated by the United States, the State, or a county or political subdivision thereof, or an agency or instrumentality of any of the foregoing” for the phrase “owned and operated by the United States, a State, the District of Columbia, or a possession of the United States, or a political subdivision or an agency or instrumentality of any of the foregoing.”

(e) References to Section 170(b)(1)(A)(iii) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the deductibility of contributions to hospitals, shall be modified to refer to subdivision (e) of Section 23736.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 252, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23704.3.

Section 501(o) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of hospitals participating in provider-sponsored organizations, shall apply, except that the reference to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to charitable organizations, shall be modified to refer to Section 23701d.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 252, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23704.4.

Section 501(k) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the treatment of certain organizations providing care of children, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(a) The reference to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to charitable organizations, shall be modified to refer to Section 23701d.

(b) The reference to Section 2522(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the computation of taxable
 gifts or Internal Revenue Code Section 2055, relating to transfers for public, charitable, and religious uses, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 227.   Effective January 1, 2008.)